vi: Loại quả anh đào Cherimoya: Atkinson; Big Egyptian; Booth; Canaria; El Bumpo; Fino de Jete; Fortuna; Knight; Sofia; Khác
fr: Variété de chérimole: Atkinson; Big Egyptian; Booth; Canaria; El Bumpo; Fino de Jete; Fortuna; Knight; Sofia; Autre
fi: Cherimoyan lajike: Atkinson; Big Egyptian; Booth; Canaria; El Bumpo; Fino de Jete; Fortuna; Knight; Sofia; Muu
nb: Cherimoya-varianten: Atkinson; Big Egyptian; Booth; Canaria; El Bumpo; Fino de Jete; Fortuna; Knight; Sofia; Annet
hr-HR: Sorta čerimoje: Atkinson; Big Egyptian; Booth; Canaria; El Bumpo; Fino de Jete; Fortuna; Knight; Sofia; Ostalo
ro-RO: Soiul de cherimoya: Atkinson; Big Egyptian; Booth; Canaria; El Bumpo; Fino de Jete; Fortuna; Knight; Sofia; Altele
th: สายพันธุ์น้อยหน่าออสเตรเลีย: แอตคินสัน; บิ๊กอียิปต์เชียน; บูธ; คานาเรีย; เอลบัมโป; ฟีโนเดเฮเต; ฟอร์ทูน่า; ไนต์; โซเฟีย; อื่นๆ
de: Cherimoya-Sorte: Atkinson; Big Egyptian; Booth; Canaria; El Bumpo; Fino de Jete; Fortuna; Knight; Sofia; Sonstiges
pt-BR: Variedade de cherimoia: Atkinson; Big Egyptian; Booth; Canaria; El Bumpo; Fino de Jete; Fortuna; Knight; Sofia; Outra
sk-SK: Odroda čerimoje: Atkinson; Big Egyptian; Booth; Canaria; El Bumpo; Fino de Jete; Fortuna; Knight; Sofia; Iné
da: Cherimoya-variant: Atkinson; Big Egyptian; Booth; Canaria; El Bumpo; Fino de Jete; Fortuna; Knight; Sofia; Andet
pt-PT: Variedade de cherimóia: Atkinson; Big Egyptian; Booth; Canaria; El Bumpo; Fino de Jete; Fortuna; Knight; Sofia; Outra
sv: Kirimojasorten: Atkinson; Big Egyptian; Booth; Canaria; El Bumpo; Fino de Jete; Fortuna; Knight; Sofia; Övrigt
sl-SI: Sorta čerimoje: Atkinson; Big Egyptian; Booth; Canaria; El Bumpo; Fino de Jete; Fortuna; Knight; Sofia; Drugo
bg-BG: Сорт черимойя: Аткинсън; Биг Иджипшън; Бут; Канария; Ел Бумпо; Фино де Хете; Фортуна; Найт; София; Други
ja: チェリモヤの種類: アトキンソン; ビッグエジプシャン; ブース; カナリア; エル・ブンポ; フィノ・デ・ヘテ; フォルトゥナ; ナイト; ソフィア; その他
ko: 체리모야 품종: 앳킨슨; 빅 이집션; 부스; 카나리아; 엘 범포; 피노 데 헤테; 포르투나; 나이트; 소피아; 기타
es: Variedad de chirimoya: Atkinson; Big Egyptian; Booth; Canaria; El Bumpo; Fino de Jete; Fortuna; Knight; Sofia; Otra
cs: Odrůda čerimoje: Atkinson; Big Egyptian; Booth; Canaria; El Bumpo; Fino de Jete; Fortuna; Knight; Sofia; Ostatní
it: varietà di cherimoya: Atkinson; Big Egyptian; Booth; Canaria; El Bumpo; Fino de Jete; Fortuna; Knight; Sofia; Altro
lt-LT: Čerimojos veislė: Atkinson; Big Egyptian; Booth; Canaria; El Bumpo; Fino de Jete; Fortuna; Knight; Sofia; Kita
pl: Odmiana czerymoi: Atkinson; Big Egyptian; Booth; Canaria; El Bumpo; Fino de Jete; Fortuna; Knight; Sofia; Inne
zh-CN: 番荔枝品种: 阿特金森; 大埃及; 布斯; 加那利; 埃尔本波; 菲诺德赫特; 福图纳; 奈特; 索菲亚; 其他
ru: Сорт черимойи: Аткинсон; Биг Иджипшен; Бут; Канария; Эль Бумпо; Фино де Хете; Фортуна; Найт; София; Другое
en: Cherimoya variety: Atkinson; Big Egyptian; Booth; Canaria; El Bumpo; Fino de Jete; Fortuna; Knight; Sofia; Other
zh-TW: 祕魯番荔枝品種: 阿特金森 (Atkinson); 大埃及 (Big Egyptian); 布斯 (Booth); 加那利 (Canaria); El Bumpo; Fino de Jete; 福圖納 (Fortuna); 奈特 (Knight); 蘇菲亞 (Sofia); 其他
nl: Cherimoya variëteit: Atkinson; Big Egyptian; Booth; Canaria; El Bumpo; Fino de Jete; Fortuna; Knight; Sofia; Overig
tr: Çerimoya çeşidi: Atkinson; Big Egyptian; Booth; Canaria; El Bumpo; Fino de Jete; Fortuna; Knight; Sofia; Diğer
hu: Cherimoya fajtája: Atkinson; Big Egyptian; Booth; Canaria; El Bumpo; Fino de Jete; Fortuna; Knight; Sofia; Egyéb
el: Ποικιλία τσεριμόγια: Atkinson; Big Egyptian; Booth; Canaria; El Bumpo; Fino de Jete; Fortuna; Knight; Sofia; Άλλο